Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 3. Subpoenas, Notices, and Hearings.

Collateral references. —

Necessity and sufficiency of notice and hearing before revocation of driver’s license, 10 ALR2d 833, 60 ALR3d 361, 60 ALR3d 427.

Sec. 28.05.111.
Subpoenas of witnesses and documents.

The commissioner of public safety and officers and employees of the Department of Public Safety designated by that commissioner, and the commissioner of administration and officers and employees of the Department of Administration designated by that commissioner, may, for good cause, subpoena witnesses to give testimony under oath or to give written deposition upon a matter under the jurisdiction of the appropriate department with respect to this title and regulations adopted under this title. A subpoena issued under this section may require the production of relevant books, papers, documents, records, or other tangible things designated in the subpoena.

A subpoena issued under this section shall be served at least five days before the return date, either by personal service made by a peace officer or another person who is not less than 18 years of age or by registered or certified mail. Return acknowledgment is required to prove service by mail. The fees for the attendance and travel of witnesses are the same as for witnesses appearing before the district court.

A subpoena issued under this section may be enforced by the district court.

History.

(§ 6 ch 178 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 99 § 37 (1997))

Administrative Code. —

For hearings, see 2 AAC 93, art. 1.

For definitions, see 2 AAC 93, art. 2.

Sec. 28.05.121.
Giving of notice.

When the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Administration is authorized or required to give notice under this title or regulations adopted under this title, unless a different method of giving notice is otherwise expressly provided, notice shall be given by a qualified person, either by personal delivery to the person to be notified or by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the person at the address of the person as shown in the records of the appropriate department. The giving of notice by mail is considered complete upon the return of the receipt or upon return of the notice as undeliverable, refused, or unclaimed. Proof of the giving of notice in either manner may be made by the affidavit of the person giving the notice by personal delivery or by mail, naming the person to whom the notice was given and specifying the time, place, and manner of giving the notice.

History.

(§ 6 ch 178 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 99 § 38 (1997))

Sec. 28.05.131.
Opportunity for hearing required.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, or unless immediate action in suspending, revoking, canceling, limiting, restricting, denying, or impounding is necessary for the protection of the health, safety, or welfare of the public, the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Administration, as appropriate, shall give notice of the opportunity for an administrative hearing before a license, registration, title, permit, or privilege issued or allowed under this title or regulations adopted under this title is suspended, revoked, cancelled, limited, restricted, or denied or a vehicle is impounded by that department. If action is required under this section and prior opportunity for a hearing cannot be afforded, the appropriate department shall promptly give notice of the opportunity for a hearing as soon after the action as possible to the parties concerned.

The notice under this section must state the reasons for the proposed action of the Department of Public Safety or of the Department of Administration, and must provide for a reasonable attendance date of not less than 10 days after service of the notice. If there is no request for a hearing by the attendance date specified in the notice, the hearing is considered to have been waived.

History.

(§ 6 ch 178 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 99 § 39 (1997))

Administrative Code. —

For driver training schools and instructors, see 2 AAC 91, art. 1.

For hearings, see 2 AAC 93, art. 1.

For definitions, see 2 AAC 93, art. 2.

Sec. 28.05.141.
Hearings and appeals.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, all hearings required under this title or regulations adopted under this title shall be conducted by the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Administration, as appropriate, under regulations adopted by the appropriate commissioner governing practice and procedure and consistent with due process of law. Hearings must be informal, and technical rules of evidence do not apply. A person who requests a hearing may retain an attorney. The hearing officer shall be appointed by the appropriate commissioner and may be appointed from the department conducting the hearing. A hearing officer need not be an attorney, but must be impartial and may not have participated in the decision that is under review. The hearing officer does not have to file a full opinion or make formal findings of fact or conclusions of law, but the hearing officer must state the reasons for the determination and indicate the evidence relied upon. The proceedings at the hearing shall be recorded.

A hearing ordered under (a) of this section must be held by telephone unless the hearing officer finds that a telephonic hearing would substantially prejudice the rights of the person involved in the hearing or that an in-person hearing is necessary to decide the issues to be presented in the hearing. An in-person hearing must be held at the office of the Department of Public Safety or of the Department of Administration nearest to the residence of the person involved in the hearing unless the appropriate department and the person agree that the hearing is to be held elsewhere. The appropriate department shall grant a hearing delay if the person presents good cause for the delay. If a person fails to attend or appear for the hearing at the time and place stated by the appropriate department and if a hearing delay has not been granted, the person’s failure to attend or appear is considered a waiver of the hearing and the appropriate department may take appropriate action with respect to the person.

If at a hearing conducted by the Department of Administration under (a) of this section it appears that the record of the person sustains suspension, revocation, limitation, denial, or other remedial action, the hearing officer shall so order and the Department of Administration may suspend, revoke, limit, deny, or take other remedial action against that person’s license, registration, or title and, if appropriate, the department shall adjust the person’s point total accumulated under AS

28.15.231

.

A person aggrieved by the decision of the hearing officer may, within 30 days after a decision is mailed or delivered to the person, file an appeal in superior court for judicial review of the hearing officer’s decision. The judicial review shall be on the record. The court may reverse the determination of the Department of Public Safety or of the Department of Administration if the court finds that the department making the determination misinterpreted the law, acted in an arbitrary and capricious manner, or made a determination unsupported by the evidence in the record. The respective department’s decision suspending, revoking, canceling, limiting, restricting, or denying a license, registration, title, permit, or privilege is stayed and does not take effect during the pendency of an appeal.

History.

(§ 6 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 158 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 6 FSSLA 1996; am E.O. No. 99 § 40 (1997))

Cross references. —

For rules of court relating to appeals from administrative proceedings, see App. Rules 601-611.

Administrative Code. —

For driver training schools and instructors, see 2 AAC 91, art. 1.

For hearings, see 2 AAC 93, art. 1.

For definitions, see 2 AAC 93, art. 2.